Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201279-201
Compulsory education;
attendance required; exceptions; reports required.

(1) For
purposes of this section, a child is of mandatory attendance age if the child
(a) will reach six years of age prior to January 1 of the then-current school
year and (b) has not reached eighteen years of age.

(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, every person
residing in a school district within the State of Nebraska who has legal or
actual charge or control of any child who is of mandatory attendance age or
is enrolled in a public school shall cause such child to enroll in, if such
child is not enrolled, and attend regularly a public, private, denominational,
or parochial day school which meets the requirements for legal operation prescribed
in Chapter 79, or a school which elects pursuant to section 79-1601 not to
meet accreditation or approval requirements, each day that such school is
open and in session, except when excused by school authorities or when illness
or severe weather conditions make attendance impossible or impracticable.

(3) Subsection (2) of this section does not apply in the case of any
child who:

(a) Has obtained a high school diploma by meeting the graduation requirements
established in section 79-729;

(b) Has completed the program of instruction offered by a school which
elects pursuant to section 79-1601 not to meet accreditation or approval requirements;

(c)
Has reached sixteen years of age and has been withdrawn from school pursuant
to section 79-202;

(d)(i) Will reach six years of
age prior to January 1 of the then-current school year, but will not reach
seven years of age prior to January 1 of such school year, (ii) such child's
parent or guardian has signed an affidavit stating that the child is participating
in an education program that the parent or guardian believes will prepare
the child to enter grade one for the following school year, and (iii) such
affidavit has been filed by the parent or guardian with the school district
in which the child resides;

(e)(i) Will reach six years of age prior to January 1 of the then-current
school year but has not reached seven years of age, (ii) such child's parent
or guardian has signed an affidavit stating that the parent or guardian intends
for the child to participate in a school which has elected or will elect pursuant
to section 79-1601 not to meet accreditation or approval requirements and
the parent or guardian intends to provide the Commissioner of Education with
a statement pursuant to subsection (3) of section 79-1601 on or before the
child's seventh birthday, and (iii) such affidavit has been filed by the parent
or guardian with the school district in which the child resides; or

(f) Will not reach six years of age prior to January 1 of the then-current
school year and such child was enrolled in a public school and has discontinued
the enrollment according to the policy of the school board adopted pursuant
to subsection (4) of this section.

(4) The board shall adopt policies allowing discontinuation of the enrollment
of students who will not reach six years of age prior to January 1 of the
then-current school year and specifying the procedures therefor.

(5) Each school district that is a member of a learning community shall
report to the learning community coordinating council on or before September
1 of each year for the immediately preceding school year the following information:

(a) All reports of violations of this section made to the attendance
officer of any school in the district pursuant to section 79-209;

(b) The results of all investigations conducted pursuant to section
79-209, including the attendance record that is the subject of the investigation
and a list of services rendered in the case;

(c) The district's policy on excessive absenteeism; and

(d) Records of all notices served and reports filed pursuant to section
79-209 and the district's policy on habitual truancy.

Laws 1901, c. 70, § 1, p. 454;

Laws 1903, c. 95, § 1, p. 549;

Laws 1905, c. 140, § 1, p. 575;

Laws 1907, c. 131, § 1, p. 430;

R.S.1913, § 6924;

Laws 1919, c. 155, § 1, p. 346;

Laws 1921, c. 53, § 1(a), p. 227;

C.S.1922, § 6508a;

Laws 1929, c. 87, § 1, p. 340;

C.S.1929, § 79-1901;

R.S.1943, § 79-1901;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 7, p. 692;

Laws 1953, c. 291, § 1, p. 988;

Laws 1959, c. 380, § 1, p. 1322;

Laws 1971, LB 211, § 1;

Laws 1971, LB 582, § 1;

Laws 1984, LB 928, § 1;

Laws 1984, LB 994, § 4;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-201;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 5;

Laws 1999, LB 152, § 1;

Laws 2004, LB 868, § 1;

Laws 2008, LB1154, § 6;

Laws 2010, LB1071, § 2;

Laws 2012, LB996, § 1.
July 19, 2012
Where a juvenile is adjudicated solely on the basis of habitual truancy from school under subsection (3)(b) of section 43-247 and the status of truancy is subsequently terminated by the lawful execution of a parental release authorizing discontinuation of school pursuant to subsection (3)(d) of this section, a juvenile court may terminate its jurisdiction without a finding that such termination is in the best interests of the juvenile. In re Interest of Kevin K., 274 Neb. 678, 742 N.W.2d 767 (2007).

The state, having a high responsibility for the education of its citizens, has the power to impose reasonable regulations for the control and duration of basic education. Parents have a right to send their children to private schools but do not have the right to be completely unfettered by reasonable government regulations as to the quality of the education furnished and the maintenance of minimum standards. State ex rel. Douglas v. Faith Baptist Church of Louisville, 207 Neb. 802, 301 N.W.2d 571 (1981).

Violation of this law is not, in itself, evidence of neglect under section 43-202(2)(c), R.R.S.1943. State v. Rice, 204 Neb. 732, 285 N.W.2d 223 (1979).

This section did not operate to violate constitutional right of parents to educate their children in accordance with the tenets of their religious faith. Meyerkorth v. State, 173 Neb. 889, 115 N.W.2d 585 (1962).

This section has no application to physically or mentally handicapped child attending special school. Schutte v. Decker, 164 Neb. 582, 83 N.W.2d 69 (1957).